Hawaii, session 2026, HB1997.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II, subpart c, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     Students with disabilities; individualized education programs; evacuation plans.  (a)  If deemed appropriate by the student's individualized education program team or section 504 plan team, the individualized education program implemented for a public school student with a disability pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, title 20 United States Code section 1400 et seq., or the section 504 plan implemented for a public school student with a disability pursuant to section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, title 29 United States Code section 794, may contain provisions addressing individualized accommodations and supports required by the student during an emergency situation or evacuation; provided that this section shall not apply to students with disabilities enrolled in a nonpublic special education school or program pursuant to section 302A-443.5. (b)  In developing the individualized accommodation and support provisions under subsection (a), the school shall provide support to the applicable individualized education program team or section 504 plan team, as necessary. (c)  During the development of an initial individualized education program or section 504 plan for a student with a disability, the individualized education program team or section 504 plan team shall determine whether the student would require individualized accommodations or supports during an emergency situation or evacuation. (d)  The department shall provide guidance to public schools explaining how to support individualized education program teams and section 504 plan teams in the teams' consideration of specific accommodations and supports the schools may provide for students with disabilities, including students with mobility impairments, during emergency situations.  Any provided accommodations and supports shall take into account the unique context of a student's disability in the educational setting." SECTION 2. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.